dictsource/fa_rules
	// arabic form of words  (Babs) د
		//فواعل eg. جوامع
			_L04وا) د (L03_	de
			_خوا) د (L03_+	da
		//فاعل eg. کاتب
			_L04ا) د (L03_+	de
		//مفعول eg. مکتوب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعول eg. خروج
			_) د (L04وL03_	do
		//فعال eg. شراب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعل eg. مکتب
			_م) د (L04L03_+	d
			_مL04) د (L03_+	da
		//افعال eg. اخلاق (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعّل eg. مقدّس
			_م) د (L04ّL03_+	da
			_مL04) د (ّL03_+	dda
		//تفعیل eg. تقدیم (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیل eg. صغیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیله eg. صغیره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر
			_اL03) د (L03_+	da
		//تفاعیل eg. تدابیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//تفاعل eg. تفاوت
			_تL04ا) د (L03_	do
		//تفعل eg. تفکر
			_ت) د (L03L03_+	da
			_تL04) د (L03_++	ddo
		//تفعّل eg. تفکّر
			_ت) د (L03ّL03_+	da
			_تL04) د (ّL03_+	ddo
		//مفاعل eg. مباحث
			_مL04ا) د (L03_	de
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_ان) د (L04اL03_++	de
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
		//مستفعل eg. مستخدم
			_مست) د (L04L03_+	d
			_مستL04) د (L03_	de
		//متفاعل eg. متفاوت
			_متL04ا) د (L03_	de
			_متL04ا) د (ی_	d
		//متفعل eg. متخصص
			_مت) د (L04L03_++	da
			_متL04) د (L03_	dde
		//متفعّل eg. متخصّص
			_مت) د (L04ّL03_++	da
			_متL04) د (ّL03_	dde
		//مفتعل eg. معتدل
			_م) د (تL04L03_+	d
			_مL04ت) د (L03_	de
		//منفعل eg. منفجر
			_من) د (L03L03_++	da
			_من) د (یL03_+	da
			_منL04) د (L03_	de
		//منفعله eg. منفجره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)


.group ذ
	// special codes for ذ
		
	// General Codes for Consonants
	ذ (L01	z
	ذ (L02	z
	L02) ذ	z
	_ا) ذ	z
	ذ (ّL08	zz
	ذ (ّ_	zz
	ذ (ّL03	zza
	ذ (L03	za
	L09) ذ (ذ+++	za
	// ذ as first letter in bondary of the words
		_) ذ (L03	za
	// ذ in end of the words
		ذ (_	z
	// ذ before و and a vowel
		_) ذ (وا	za
		_) ذ (وL02	za
		_) ذ (ویL03	za
		_) ذ (ویL01	z
		_) ذ (ویL02	z
		_) ذ (وی_	z
		L09) ذ (وL02	z
	// Others 
		ذ (ه_+++	z
		ذ (ۀ_	z
		ذ (ـL01	z
		ذ (ـL02	z
		ذ (ـL03	za
		ذ (ــL01	z
		ذ (ــL02	z
		ذ (ــL03	za
		ذ (ـــL01	z
		ذ (ـــL02	z
		ذ (ـــL03	za
		ذ (ــ	za
	// Consonants Analyzer
	// Right to left characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 3 Consonants
			_آ) ذ (L03_	za
			_آ) ذ (د_+	z
			_آ) ذ (ر_+	z
			_او) ذ (L03_+	z
			_ای) ذ (L03_+	z
			_L04) ذ (L03_	z
		//Analyzing  2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants
			_L03) ذ (L05L06_	za
			_L03) ذ (L06L03_	z
			_آ) ذ (L03L01	z
			_آ) ذ (L03L02	z
			_L03) ذ (L03L01	z
			_L03) ذ (L06L03	za
			_L03) ذ (رL03+	za
			_L03) ذ (L05L03	za
		// Analyzing 3th  Consonant of 6 Consonants
			_L09L01) ذ (L03L09L09	z
			_L03L03) ذ (L03L09L09	z
			_L01L03) ذ (L03L09L09	za
		// Analyzing 4th  Consonant of 8 Consonants
			_L09L09L09) ذ (L03L09L09L09	za
	// Left to right characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L01) ذ (L03_	z
			L09L01) ذ (ث_+	za
			L09L01) ذ (ص_+	za
			L09L01) ذ (س_+	za
			L09L01) ذ (ش_+	za
			L09L01) ذ (ر_+	za
			L09L01) ذ (ق_+	za
			L09L01) ذ (غ_+	za
			L09L01) ذ (L07_+N	z
			L01L03) ذ (L03_	za
			L01L03) ذ (L07_+N	z
			L03L03) ذ (L06_	z
			L03L03) ذ (L05_	za
		// Analyzing 3th Consonant of 5 Consonants (left to right)
			L09ذ) ذ (L03L09_+	z
			L09L05) ذ (L05L06_	za
			L09L05) ذ (L03L09_	z
			_L04L06) ذ (L06L09_+	z
			_آL06) ذ (L03L09_+	z
			L09L06) ذ (L03L09_	za
			L09L01) ذ (L03L09_	z
		// Analyzing 4th Consonant of 7 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09) ذ (L03L09L09_	z
			_L01L09L03) ذ (L03L09L09_	z
			_L03L09L03) ذ (L03L09L09_	za
		// Analyzing 5th Consonant of 9 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09L09) ذ (L03L09L09L09_	za

	// Prefixes ذ
		_) ذی (L04L09L09$noprefixP2@	zi
		_) ذی (آL09L09$noprefixP2@	zi
		_) ذوال (L04L09L09P4@	zol
		_) ذوال (آL09L09P4@	zol

	// Suffixes ذ
		
	// arabic form of words  (Babs) ذ
		//فواعل eg. جوامع
			_L04وا) ذ (L03_+	ze
			_خوا) ذ (L03_+	z
		//فاعل eg. کاتب
			_L04ا) ذ (L03_+	ze
		//مفعول eg. مکتوب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعول eg. خروج
			_) ذ (L04وL03_	zo
		//فعال eg. شراب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعل eg. مکتب
			_م) ذ (L04L03_+	z
			_مL04) ذ (L03_+	za
		//افعال eg. اخلاق (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعّل eg. مقدّس
			_م) ذ (L04ّL03_+	za
			_مL04) ذ (ّL03_+	zza
		//تفعیل eg. تقدیم (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیل eg. صغیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیله eg. صغیره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر
			_اL03) ذ (L03_+	za
		//تفاعیل eg. تدابیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//تفاعل eg. تفاوت
			_تL04ا) ذ (L03_+	zo
		//تفعل eg. تفکر
			_ت) ذ (L03L03_+	za
			_تL04) ذ (L03_++	zzo
		//تفعّل eg. تفکّر
			_ت) ذ (L03ّL03_+	za
			_تL04) ذ (ّL03_+	zzo
		//مفاعل eg. مباحث
			_مL04ا) ذ (L03_+	ze
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_ان) ذ (L04اL03_++	ze
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
		//مستفعل eg. مستخدم
			_مست) ذ (L04L03_+	z
			_مستL04) ذ (L03_	ze
		//متفاعل eg. متفاوت
			_متL04ا) ذ (L03_	ze
			_متL04ا) ذ (ی_	z
		//متفعل eg. متخصص
			_مت) ذ (L04L03_++	za
			_متL04) ذ (L03_+	zze
		//متفعّل eg. متخصّص
			_مت) ذ (L04ّL03_++	za
			_متL04) ذ (ّL03_	zze
		//مفتعل eg. معتدل
			_م) ذ (تL04L03_+	z
			_مL04ت) ذ (L03_	ze
		//منفعل eg. منفجر
			_من) ذ (L03L03_++	za
			_من) ذ (یL03_+	za
			_منL04) ذ (L03_+	ze
		//منفعله eg. منفجره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)


.group ر
	// special codes for ر
		
	// General Codes for Consonants (Attention! This letter in its general codes has additional special codes)
	ر (L01	R
	ر (L02	R
	L02) ر	R
	_ا) ر	R
	ر (ّL08	RR
	ر (ّ_	RR
	ر (ّL03	RRa
	ر (L03	Ra
	L09) ر (ر+++	Ra
	// ر as first letter in bondary of the words
		_) ر (L03	Ra
	// ر in end of the words
		ر (_	R
	// ر before و and a vowel
		_) ر (وا	Ra
		_) ر (وL02	Ra
		_) ر (ویL03	Ra
		_) ر (ویL01	R
		_) ر (ویL02	R
		_) ر (وی_	R
		L09) ر (وL02	R
	// Others 
		ر (ه_+++	R
		ر (ۀ_	R
		ر (ـL01	R
		ر (ـL02	R
		ر (ـL03	Ra
		ر (ــL01	R
		ر (ــL02	R
		ر (ــL03	Ra
		ر (ـــL01	R
		ر (ـــL02	R
		ر (ـــL03	Ra
		ر (ــ	Ra
	// Consonants Analyzer
	// Right to left characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 3 Consonants
			_آ) ر (L03_	Ra
			_آ) ر (د_+	R
			_آ) ر (ر_+	R
			_او) ر (L03_+	R
			_ای) ر (L03_+	R
			_L04) ر (L03_	R
		//Analyzing  2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants
			_L03) ر (L05L06_	Ra
			_L03) ر (L06L03_	R
			_آ) ر (L03L01	R
			_آ) ر (L03L02	R
			_L03) ر (L03L01	R
			_L03) ر (L06L03	Ra
			_L03) ر (رL03+	Ra
			_L03) ر (L05L03	R
		// Analyzing 3th  Consonant of 6 Consonants
			_L09L01) ر (L03L09L09	R
			_L03L03) ر (L03L09L09	R
			_L01L03) ر (L03L09L09	Ra
		// Analyzing 4th  Consonant of 8 Consonants
			_L09L09L09) ر (L03L09L09L09	Ra
	// Left to right characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L01) ر (L03_	Ra
			L09L01) ر (L07_+N	R
			L09L01) ر (L07_+N	R
			L01L03) ر (L03_	Ra
			L01L03) ر (L07_+N	R
			L03L03) ر (L03_	Ra
			_L03L03) ر (د_+	R
		// Analyzing 3th Consonant of 5 Consonants (left to right)
			L09ر) ر (L03L09_+	R
			_L04L03) ر (L06L09_+	R
			_آL03) ر (L05L06_+	Ra
			_آL03) ر (L03L09_+	R
			L09L03) ر (L03L09_	Ra
			L09L01) ر (L03L09_	R
		// Analyzing 4th Consonant of 7 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09) ر (L03L09L09_	R
			_L01L09L03) ر (L03L09L09_	R
			_L03L09L03) ر (L03L09L09_	Ra
		// Analyzing 5th Consonant of 9 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09L09) ر (L03L09L09L09_	Ra

	// Prefixes ر
		_) رضا (L04L09L09P3@	RezA
		_) رضا (آL09L09P3@	RezA
		_) ریز (L04L09L09P3@	Riz
		_) ریز (آL09L09P3@	Riz
		_) راست (L04L09L09P4@	RAst:
		_) راست (آL09L09P4@	RAst
		_) رنگ (L04L09L09P3@	Rang
		_) رنگ (آL09L09P3@	Rang

	// suffixes ر
		//L09L09L09) ران (_Sm3	RAn
		//L09L09L09) رانی (_Sm4	RAni
		L09L09L09) رانها (_Sm5	RAnha
		L09L09L09) رانهای (_Sm6	RAnhAje
		L09L09L09) رانهایی (_Sm7	RAnhAi:
		L09L09L09) رانان (_Sm5	RAnAn
		L09L09) ربا (_Sm3	RobA
		L09L09) رضا (_Sm3	RezA
		L09L09) رسان (_Sm4	ResAn
		L09L09) رنگ (_Sm3	Rang
		L09L09) روان (_Sm4	RavAn
		L09L09) ریز (_Sm3	Riz

	// arabic form of words  (Babs) ر
		//فواعل eg. جوامع
			_L04وا) ر (L03_	Re
			_خوا) ر (L03_+	Ra
		//فاعل eg. کاتب
			_L04ا) ر (L03_+	Re
		//مفعول eg. مکتوب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعول eg. خروج
			_) ر (L04وL03_	Ro
		//فعال eg. شراب (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعل eg. مکتب
			_م) ر (L04L03_+	R
			_مL04) ر (L03_+	Ra
		//افعال eg. اخلاق (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//مفعّل eg. مقدّس
			_م) ر (L04ّL03_+	Ra
			_مL04) ر (ّL03_+	RRa
		//تفعیل eg. تقدیم (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیل eg. صغیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//فعیله eg. صغیره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//افعل eg. اصغر
			_اL03) ر (L03_+	Ra
		//تفاعیل eg. تدابیر (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//تفاعل eg. تفاوت
			_تL04ا) ر (L03_	Ro
		//تفعل eg. تفکر
			_ت) ر (L03L03_+	Ra
			_تL04) ر (L03_++	RRo
		//تفعّل eg. تفکّر
			_ت) ر (L03ّL03_+	Ra
			_تL04) ر (ّL03_+	RRo
		//مفاعل eg. مباحث
			_مL04ا) ر (L03_	Re
		//استفعال eg. استخراج (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)
		//انفعال eg. انفجار
			_ان) ر (L04اL03_++	Re
		//افتعال eg. افتخار
		//مستفعل eg. مستخدم
			_مست) ر (L04L03_+	R
			_مستL04) ر (L03_	Re
		//متفاعل eg. متفاوت
			_متL04ا) ر (L03_	Re
			_متL04ا) ر (ی_	R
		//متفعل eg. متخصص
			_مت) ر (L04L03_++	Ra
			_متL04) ر (L03_	RRe
		//متفعّل eg. متخصّص
			_مت) ر (L04ّL03_++	Ra
			_متL04) ر (ّL03_	RRe
		//مفتعل eg. معتدل
			_م) ر (تL04L03_+	R
			_مL04ت) ر (L03_	Re
		//منفعل eg. منفجر
			_من) ر (L03L03_++	Ra
			_من) ر (یL03_+	Ra
			_منL04) ر (L03_	Re
		//منفعله eg. منفجره (Fa eSpeak read itd correctly)


.group ز
	// special codes for ز
		
	// General Codes for Consonants
	ز (L01	z
	ز (L02	z
	L02) ز	z
	_ا) ز	z
	ز (ّL08	zz
	ز (ّ_	zz
	ز (ّL03	zza
	ز (L03	za
	L09) ز (ز+++	za
	// ز as first letter in bondary of the words
		_) ز (L03	za
	// ز in end of the words
		ز (_	z
	// ز before و and a vowel
		_) ز (وا	za
		_) ز (وL02	za
		_) ز (ویL03	za
		_) ز (ویL01	z
		_) ز (ویL02	z
		_) ز (وی_	z
		L09) ز (وL02	z
	// Others 
		ز (ه_+++	z
		ز (ۀ_	z
		ز (ـL01	z
		ز (ـL02	z
		ز (ـL03	za
		ز (ــL01	z
		ز (ــL02	z
		ز (ــL03	za
		ز (ـــL01	z
		ز (ـــL02	z
		ز (ـــL03	za
		ز (ــ	za
	// Consonants Analyzer
	// Right to left characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 3 Consonants
			_آ) ز (L03_	za
			_آ) ز (د_+	z
			_آ) ز (ر_+	z
			_او) ز (L03_+	z
			_ای) ز (L03_+	z
			_L04) ز (L03_	z
		//Analyzing  2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants
			_L03) ز (L05L06_	za
			_L03) ز (L06L03_	z
			_آ) ز (L03L01	z
			_آ) ز (L03L02	z
			_L03) ز (L03L01	z
			_L03) ز (L06L03	za
			_L03) ز (رL03+	za
			_L03) ز (L05L03	za
		// Analyzing 3th  Consonant of 6 Consonants
			_L09L01) ز (L03L09L09	z
			_L03L03) ز (L03L09L09	z
			_L01L03) ز (L03L09L09	za
		// Analyzing 4th  Consonant of 8 Consonants
			_L09L09L09) ز (L03L09L09L09	za
	// Left to right characters Analyzer
		// Analyzing 2nd Consonant of 4 Consonants (left to right)
			L01L01) ز (L03_	za
			L09L01) ز (L03_	z
			L09L01) ز (ث_+	za
			L09L01) ز (ص_+	za
			L09L01) ز (س_+	za
			L09L01) ز (ش_+	za
			L09L01) ز (ر_+	za
			L09L01) ز (ق_+	za
			L09L01) ز (غ_+	za
			L09L01) ز (L07_+N	z
			L01L03) ز (L03_	za
			L01L03) ز (L07_+N	z
			L03L03) ز (L06_	z
			L03L03) ز (L05_	za
		// Analyzing 3th Consonant of 5 Consonants (left to right)
			L09ز) ز (L03L09_+	z
			L09L05) ز (L05L06_	za
			L09L05) ز (L03L09_	z
			_L04L06) ز (L06L09_+	z
			_آL06) ز (L03L09_+	z
			L09L06) ز (L03L09_	za
			L09L01) ز (L03L09_	z
		// Analyzing 4th Consonant of 7 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09) ز (L03L09L09_	z
			_L01L09L03) ز (L03L09L09_	z
			_L03L09L03) ز (L03L09L09_	za
		// Analyzing 5th Consonant of 9 Consonants (left to right)
			L09L09L09L09) ز (L03L09L09L09_	za

	// Prefixes ز
		_) زیر (L04L09L09$noprefixP3@	ziR
		_) زیر (آL09L09$noprefixP3@	ziR
		_) زود (L04L09L09$noprefixP3@	zud
		_) زود (آL09L09$noprefixP3@	zud
		_) زرد (L04L09L09$noprefixP3@	zaRd
		_) زرد (آL09L09$noprefixP3@	zaRd

	// suffixes ز
		L09L09) زاد (_Sm3	zAd
		L09L09-) زا (_Sm2	zA
		L09L09) زار (_Sm3	zAR
		L09L09) زدگی (_Sm4	zadegi
		L09L09) زده (_+Sm3	zade:
		L09L09) زدۀ (_+Sm3	zadeje
		L09L09) زدن (_Sm3	zadan
		L09L09) زدا (_Sm3	zodA
